North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 14B. Supervision and Regulation.

§ 54-109.10.
Creation and supervision of Division.

There shall be established in the North Carolina Department of Commerce a Credit Union Division which shall be under the supervision of the Administrator of Credit Unions appointed by the Secretary of Commerce. The Credit Union Division and the Administrator of Credit Unions shall be under the general direction and supervision of the Secretary of Commerce, and there shall be such assistants to the Administrator of Credit Unions as may be necessary and the salaries of the Administrator and assistants shall be fixed by the State Personnel Council.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 1; C.S., s. 5208; 1925, c. 73, s. 4; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, s. 1; 1971, c. 864, s. 17; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1989, c. 751, s. 9(c); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 3.

§ 54-109.11.
Duties of Administrator.

The duties of the Administrator of Credit Unions shall be as follows:

To organize and conduct in the State Department of Commerce, a bureau of information in regard to cooperative associations and rural and industrial credits.

Upon request, to furnish, without cost, such printed information and blank forms as, in his discretion, may be necessary for the formation and establishment of any local credit union in the State.

To maintain an educational campaign in the State looking to the promotion and organization of credit unions. Upon the written request of 12 bona fide residents of any particular locality in this State expressing a desire to form a local credit union at or in such locality, the Administrator of Credit Unions, or one of his assistants, shall proceed as promptly as may be convenient to such locality and make an investigation in order that the Administrator may determine whether or not a local credit union should be established according to the standards set forth and provided in this Article. The Administrator shall notify the applicants of his decision within 30 days after receipt of the written request. Before refusing the establishment of a credit union, the Administrator shall afford the applicants an opportunity to be heard therewith in person or by counsel and at least 60 days prior to the date set for a hearing on any such matter shall notify in writing the applicants of the date of said hearing and assign therein the grounds for the action contemplated to be taken and as to which inquiry shall be made on the date of such hearing. The determination of the Administrator shall be subject to judicial review in all respects according to the provisions and procedures set forth in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes of North Carolina, as amended.

To examine at least once every 18 months, or more often if an examination is deemed necessary by the Administrator or the Administrator’s assistant, the credit unions formed under Article 14A of this Chapter. A report of the examination shall be filed with the State Department of Commerce, and a copy mailed to the credit union at its proper address.

The Administrator of Credit Unions is authorized, empowered, and directed to fix the amount of a blanket surety bond which shall be required of each credit union official, committee member and employee, irrespective of whether such official, committee member and employee receives, pays or has custody of money or other personal property owned by a credit union or in the custody or control of the credit union as collateral or otherwise. The surety on the bond shall be a surety company authorized to do business in North Carolina. Any such bond or bonds shall be in a form approved by the Administrator of Credit Unions with a view to providing surety coverage to the credit union with reference to loss by reason of acts of fraud or dishonesty including forgery, theft, embezzlement, wrongful abstraction or misapplication on the part of the person, directly or through connivance with others, and such other surety coverages as the Administrator of Credit Unions may determine to be reasonably appropriate or as elsewhere required by the Chapter. Any such bond or bonds shall be in an amount in relation to the money or other personal property involved or in relation to the assets of the credit union as the Administrator may from time to time prescribe by regulation for the purpose of requiring reasonable coverage. The Administrator may also approve the use of a form of excess coverage bond whereby a credit union may obtain an amount of coverage in excess of the basic surety coverage. No agreement, compromise or settlement of any claim or claims filed by a credit union with any surety or any surety company for less than the full amount of said claim or claims shall be entered into or made by the board of directors of any credit union unless and until the said claim or claims shall have been submitted to the Administrator of Credit Unions and his advice thereon given or transmitted to the board of directors of said credit union. The following schedule shall be deemed as the minimum fidelity and faithful performance bond requirements only:

Click to view

It shall be the duty of the board of directors of each credit union to provide proper protection to meet any circumstances by obtaining adequate bond (an insurance) coverage in excess of the above minimum schedule. The treasurer and all other persons handling credit union funds or records before entering upon his or their duties shall give a proper bond with good and sufficient surety, in an amount and character to be determined by the board in compliance with regulations conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or their trust.

The Administrator may require additional coverage for any credit union when, in his opinion, the surety bonds in force are insufficient to provide adequate surety coverage, and it shall be the duty of the board of directors of any credit union to obtain such additional coverage within 60 days after the date of written notice by the Administrator to such board of directors. For good cause shown, the Administrator may extend the time to obtain additional coverage.

Assets Minimum Coverage $ 0,000 to $ 5,000 $ 1,000 5,001 to 10,000 2,000 10,001 to 20,000 4,000 20,001 to 30,000 6,000 30,001 to 40,000 8,000 40,001 to 50,000 10,000 50,001 to 75,000 15,000 75,001 to 100,000 20,000 100,001 to 200,000 30,000 200,001 to 300,000 40,000 300,001 to 400,000 50,000 400,001 to 500,000 70,000 500,001 to 750,000 85,000 750,001 to 1,000,000 100,000 1,000,001 to 50,000,000 $100,000 plus $50,000 for each million or fraction thereof of assets over $1,000,000 $50,000,001 to $150,000,000 $2,500,000 plus $25,000 for each million or fraction thereof of assets over $50,000,000 Over $150,000,000 $5,000,000

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 1; C.S., s. 5209; 1925, c. 73, ss. 2, 3, 5, 6; 1935, c. 87; 1957, c. 989, s. 1; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1-3; 1971, c. 864, s. 17; 1973, c. 199, ss. 1-3; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1977, c. 559, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1989, c. 751, s. 7(2); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, ss. 4, 4.1; 2017-25, s. 4(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-25, s. 4(a), effective June 2, 2017, in subdivision (4), in the first sentence, substituted “every 18 months, or more often if an examination is” for “a year, and oftener such examination be” in the beginning, substituted “the Administrator’s” for “his”, and substituted “under Article 14A of this Chapter” for “under this Article” and substituted “the examination” for “such examination” in the second sentence.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Performance Bonds. —

A State-chartered credit union, acting pursuant to 4 N.C.A.C. 06C.0311, must provide a performance bond for not only its chief executive officer but for other officers, employees, or agents. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Stanley W. Brown, Jr., Deputy Administrator, Credit Union Div., Department of Commerce, 59 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 8 (1989).

The language of subdivision (5) of this section and of

G.S. 54-109.44(2)

relating to blanket surety bonds is mandatory

and extends to all state-chartered credit union officers, employees, agents, and others in a position of trust. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Stanley W. Brown, Jr., Deputy Administrator, Credit Union Division, Department of Commerce, 59 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 8 (1989).

Conflicting Administrative Rule Was Void. —

To the extent that an administrative rule purported to permit an individual’s bond to be substituted for the blanket bond or to permit an individual’s bond to cover persons other than those specified in subdivision (5) of this section, it was in conflict with controlling law and was void. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Stanley W. Brown, Jr., Deputy Administrator, Credit Union Division, Department of Commerce, 59 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 8 (1989).

Discretion of Administrator and Board. —

The provision of subdivision (5) of this section requiring a surety bond of the “treasurer and all other persons handling credit union funds or records” means that the board of directors may require, consistent with administrative rules promulgated by the administrator, an additional surety bond for those having actual possession of or control over credit union funds or financial records. Since the administrator has broad discretion and authority under

G.S. 54-109.12

to prescribe rules “relating to financial records, business practices and the conduct and management of credit unions,” the administrator can promulgate reasonable guidelines for boards of directors to follow in determining the “amount and character” of the bond to be required. However, it is not within the discretion of a board of directors or the administrator to determine who shall be covered by the bond, other than to identify “persons handling credit union funds or records.” See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Stanley W. Brown, Jr., Deputy Administrator, Credit Union Division, Department of Commerce, 59 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 8 (1989).

Discretion of Administrator and Board. —

The additional bond provided for in subdivision (5) of this section, must cover “the treasurer and all other persons handling credit union funds or records.” Nothing in the statutes permits the chief financial officer or the chief executive officer of a state-chartered credit union to be substituted for the persons specified. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Stanley W. Brown, Jr., Deputy Administrator, Credit Union Division, Department of Commerce, 59 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 8 (1989).

§ 54-109.12.
Corporations organized hereunder subject to Administrator of Credit Unions; rules and regulations.

In addition to any and all other powers, duties and functions vested in the Administrator of Credit Unions under the provisions of this Article, the Administrator of Credit Unions shall have general control, management and supervision over all corporations organized under the provisions of Article 14A. All corporations organized under the provisions of Article 14A shall be subject to the management, control and supervision of the Administrator of Credit Unions as to their conduct, organization, management, business practices and their financial and fiscal matters. The Administrator of Credit Unions may prescribe rules and regulations for the administration of this Article, as well as rules and regulations relating to financial records, business practices and the conduct and management of credit unions, and it shall be the duty of the board of directors and of the various officers of the credit union to put into effect and to carry out such regulations.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 7; C.S., s. 5237; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1957, c. 989, s. 6; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 22; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1979, c. 198.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The provision of

G.S. 54-109.11(5)

requiring a surety bond

of the “treasurer and all other persons handling credit union funds or records” means that the board of directors may require, consistent with administrative rules promulgated by the administrator, an additional surety bond for those having actual possession of or control over credit union funds or financial records. Since the administrator has broad discretion and authority under this section to prescribe rules “relating to financial records, business practices and the conduct and management of credit unions,” the administrator can promulgate reasonable guidelines for boards of directors to follow in determining the “amount and character” of the bond to be required. However, it is not within the discretion of a board of directors or the administrator to determine who shall be covered by the bond, other than to identify “persons handling credit union funds or records.” See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Stanley W. Brown, Jr., Deputy Administrator, Credit Union Division, Department of Commerce, 59 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 8 (1989).

§ 54-109.13.
Revocation of certificate; liquidation.

If any such corporation shall neglect to make its annual report, as provided in this Article, or any other report required by the Administrator of Credit Unions for more than 15 days, or shall fail to pay the charges required, including the fines for delay in filing reports, the Administrator of Credit Unions shall give notice to such corporation of his intention to revoke the certificate of approval of the corporation for such neglect or failure, and if such neglect or failure continues for 15 days after such notice, the said Administrator shall, at his discretion, personally or by an agent appointed by him, take possession of the property and business of the corporation and retain possession until such time as he may permit it to resume business, or until its affairs be finally liquidated as provided for in

G.S. 54-109.93

.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 7; C.S., s. 5240; 1925, c. 73, ss. 3, 8; 1935, c. 87; 1957, c. 989, s. 8; 1965, c. 956, s. 1; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.14.
Fees.

Each credit union subject to supervision and examination by the Administrator of Credit Unions, including credit unions in process of voluntary liquidation, shall pay into the office of the Administrator of Credit Unions twice each year, in the months of January and July, supervision fees, except those credit unions which liquidate or convert its charter shall pay into the office of the Administrator of Credit Unions, to the date of dissolution, pro rata supervision fees. Examination fees shall be paid promptly upon receipt of the examination report and invoice.The Administrator of Credit Unions, subject to the advice and consent of the Credit Union Commission, shall, on or before December 1 of each year, determine and fix the scale of supervisory and examination fees to be assessed during the next calendar year.No credit union shall be required to pay any supervisory fee until the expiration of 12 months from the date of the issuance of a certificate of incorporation to such credit union.

Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited with the State Treasurer of North Carolina and expended, under the terms of the Executive Budget Act, to defray expenses incurred by the office of the Administrator of Credit Unions in carrying out its supervisory and auditing functions.

All revenue derived from fees will be placed into a special account to be administered solely for the operation of the Credit Union Division.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 7; C.S., s. 5238; 1925, c. 73, ss. 3, 7; 1935, c. 87; 1941, c. 235; 1955, c. 1135, ss. 3, 4; 1957, c. 989, s. 7; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 23, 24; 1969, c. 69, s. 6; 1971, c. 864, s. 17; 1973, c. 199, s. 12; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1977, c. 559, ss. 2, 3.

§ 54-109.15.
Reports.

Credit unions organized under Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter shall, in January and in July of each year, make a report of condition to the Administrator of Credit Unions on forms supplied for that purpose. Additional reports may be required.

Any credit union that neglects to make semiannual reports as provided in subsection (a) of this section, or any of the other reports required by the Administrator of Credit Unions at the time fixed by the Administrator, shall pay a late penalty to the Administrator of Credit Unions of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for each day the neglect continues. The Administrator of Credit Unions may revoke the certificate of incorporation and take possession of the assets and business of any credit union failing to pay a penalty imposed under this section after serving notice of at least 15 days upon the credit union of the proposed action. The clear proceeds of penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 7; C.S., ss. 5238, 5240; 1925, c. 73, ss. 3, 7, 8; 1935, c. 87; 1941, c. 235; 1955, c. 1135, ss. 3, 4; 1957, c. 989, ss. 7, 8; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 23, 24; 1969, c. 69, s. 6; 1971, c. 864, s. 17; 1973, c. 199, s. 12; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1991, c. 651, s. 2; 2005-276, s. 6.37(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 6.37(u), effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (b), rewrote the last sentence which formerly read: “Penalties collected under this section shall be credited to the special account established under

G.S. 54-109.14

.”

§ 54-109.16.
Examinations required; payment of cost.

The Administrator of Credit Unions shall cause every credit union formed under Article 14A of this Chapter to be examined once every 18 months or whenever the Administrator deems it necessary. The examiners appointed by the Administrator shall be given free access to all books, papers, securities, and other sources of information in respect to the credit union; for the purpose of the examination, the Administrator may subpoena and examine personally, or by one of the Administrator’s deputies or examiners, witnesses on oath and documents, whether the witnesses are members of the credit union or not, and whether the documents are documents of the credit union or not. The Administrator may designate an independent auditing firm to do the work under the Administrator’s direction and supervision, with the cost to be paid by the credit union involved.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 7; C.S., s. 5239; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 25; 1969, c. 69, ss. 7, 8; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1977, c. 559, s. 4; 2017-25, s. 4(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-25, s. 4(b), effective June 2, 2017, substituted “Examinations” for “Annual Examinations” in the section heading; throughout this section, substituted “the Administrator” for “him” and “his” or similar variations and substituted “credit union” for “corporation”; in the first sentence, substituted “credit union formed under Article 14A of this Chapter” for “such corporation” and “every 18 months or” for “a year and”; substituted “may subpoena” for “shall have power and authority to subpoena” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 54-109.17.
Records.

A credit union shall maintain all books, records, accounting systems and procedures in accordance with such rules as the Administrator from time to time prescribes. In prescribing such rules, the Administrator shall consider the relative size of a credit union and its reasonable capability of compliance.

A credit union is not liable for destroying records after the expiration of the record retention time prescribed by the Administrator.

A photostatic or photographic reproduction of any credit union records shall be admissible as evidence of transactions with the credit union.

History.

1973, c. 98, s. 1; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.18.
Selection of attorneys to handle loan-closing proceedings.

The Administrator of Credit Unions shall establish rules and regulations relating to selection of attorneys-at-law to handle credit union loan closing proceedings.

History.

1977, c. 559, s. 10.

§ 54-109.19.
Removal of officers.

The Administrator of Credit Unions shall have the right and is hereby empowered to serve a written notice of his intention to remove from office any officer, director, committeeman or employee of any credit union doing business under Articles 14A through 15A of this Chapter who shall be found to be dishonest, incompetent, or reckless in the management of the affairs of the credit union, or who persistently violates the laws of this State or the lawful orders, instructions and regulations issued by the Administrator and/or the State Credit Union Commission.

A notice of intention to remove a director, officer, committee member or employee from office shall contain a statement of the alleged facts constituting the grounds therefor and shall fix a time and place at which a hearing before the Credit Union Commission will be held thereon. Such hearing shall be fixed for a date not earlier than 30 days nor later than 60 days after the date of service of such notice unless an earlier or a later date is set by the Commission at the request of such director, officer, committee member or employee and for good cause shown. Pending this hearing, the Administrator may remove the alleged violator if he finds that it is essential to the continued well-being of the credit union or the public to do so. Unless, of course, such director, officer, committee member or employee shall appear at the hearing in person or by a duly authorized representative, he shall be deemed to have consented to the issuance of an order of such removal. In the event of such consent, or if upon the record made at any such hearing the Credit Union Commission shall find that any of the grounds specified in such notice has been determined by the greater weight of the evidence, the Commission may issue such orders of removal from office as it may deem appropriate. Any such order shall become effective at the expiration of 30 days after service upon such credit union and the director, officer, committee member or employee concerned (except in the case of an order issued upon consent, which shall become effective at the time specified therein). Such order shall remain effective and enforceable except to such extent as it is stayed, modified, terminated or set aside by action of the Credit Union Commission or a reviewing court.

History.

1979, c. 197, s. 1.

§ 54-109.20.

Reserved for future codification purposes.